tests/y-ligatures.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen:  ../tat.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tat.automorf.hfst

Tests: 

  "[twol] some basic noun forms": 
    ай<n><nom> : ай
    ай<n><px3sp><nom> : ае
    ай<n><px1sg><nom> : аем
    уңай<adj><subst><nom> : уңай
    уңай<adj><subst><px3sp><nom> : уңае
    уңай<adj><subst><px1sg><nom> : уңаем

  "[twol] some forms that should harmonise":
    ай<n><px3sp><loc> : аенда
    ай<n><px3sp><gen> : аеның
    уңай<adj><subst><px3sp><loc> : уңаенда
    уңай<adj><subst><px3sp><gen> : уңаеның

  "[twol] normal words with final й that shouldn't disappear":
    куй<v><tv><ifi><p3><sg> : куйды
    өй<n><dat> : өйгә

  "[twol] normal words with final й that should disappear":
    куй<v><tv><pres><p1><sg> : куям
    өй<n><px1sg><nom> : өем
